Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 43.17 RCW to read as follows:(1) No state or local agency, including any law enforcement agency, shall purchase or otherwise acquire a small unmanned aircraft system that is manufactured or assembled by a covered foreign entity.(2) No state or local agency funds may be used in connection with small unmanned aircraft systems manufactured or assembled by a covered foreign entity, including without limitation state or local agency funds:(a) Awarded through a contract, grant, or cooperative agreement; or(b) Otherwise made available.(3) On or after July 1, 2026, a public entity shall not operate a small unmanned aircraft system manufactured or assembled by a covered foreign entity.(4) For the purposes of this section:(a) "Agency" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 42.56.010.(b) "Covered foreign entity" means an individual, person, foreign government, or a party that is:(i) On the consolidated screening list or the entity list, supplement No. 4 to 15 C.F.R. Part 744, as each are published by the United States department of commerce on the effective date of this section;(ii) Domiciled in the People's Republic of China or the Russian Federation;(iii) Under the influence or control by the government of the People's Republic of China or the Russian Federation; or(iv) A subsidiary or affiliate of an individual, government, or party referred to in (b)(i) through (iii) of this subsection.(c) "Small unmanned aircraft system" means an aircraft that:(i) Is an unmanned, powered aircraft that is operated without the possibility of direct human intervention from within or on the aircraft;(ii) May be expendable or recoverable; and(iii) Weighs less than 55 pounds including the weight of anything attached to or carried by the aircraft.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---